Colorado, session 2026A, SB041.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 3 to article
4 of title 6; and add with amended and relocated provisions part 2 to
article 4 of title 6 as follows:
PART 2
UNIFORM ANTITRUST PRE-MERGER
NOTIFICATION ACT
6-4-201. [Formerly 6-4.5-101] Short title.
This article 4.5 PART 2 may be cited as the "Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act".
-3- SB26-041

6-4-202. [Formerly 6-4.5-102] Definitions.
In this article 4.5 AS USED IN THIS PART 2:
(1) "Additional documentary material" means the additional
documentary material filed with a Hart-Scott-Rodino form.
(2) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities.
(3) "Filing threshold" means the minimum size of a transaction
that requires the transaction to be reported under the Hart-Scott-Rodino
Act in effect when a person files a pre-merger notification.
(4) "Hart-Scott-Rodino Act" means section 201 of the FEDERAL
"Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976", 15 U.S.C. sec.
18 (a) 18a.
(5) "Hart-Scott-Rodino form" means the form filed with a
pre-merger notification, excluding additional documentary material.
(6) "Person" means an individual; estate; business or nonprofit
entity; government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; or other legal entity.
(7) "Pre-merger notification" means a notification filed under the
Hart-Scott-Rodino Act with the federal trade commission or the United
States department of justice antitrust division, or a successor agency.
(8) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other
territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
6-4-203. [Formerly 6-4.5-103] Filing requirement - rules.
(a) A person filing a pre-merger notification shall file
contemporaneously a complete electronic copy of the Hart-Scott-Rodino
-4- SB26-041

form with the attorney general if EITHER PARTY TO THE MERGER:
(1) The person Has its principal place of business in this state; or
(2) The person or a person it controls Directly or indirectly had
annual net sales in this state of the goods or services involved in the
transaction of at least twenty percent of the filing threshold.
(b) A person that files a form under subsection (2)(a) (a) of this
section shall include with the filing a complete electronic copy of the
additional documentary material.
(c) On request of the attorney general, a person that filed a form
under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall provide a complete electronic
copy of the additional documentary material to the attorney general not
later than seven days after receipt of the request.
(d) (1) The attorney general may not charge a REASONABLE fee
connected with filing or providing the form or additional documentary
material under this section.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT RULES GOVERNING THE
FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (d)(1) OF THIS SECTION. THE FEE MUST NOT
EXCEED FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH FILING PARTY.
6-4-204. [Formerly 6-4.5-104] Confidentiality.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section or section
6-4.5-105 6-4-205, the attorney general may not make public or disclose:
(1) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form filed under section 6-4.5-103
6-4-203;
(2) The additional documentary material filed or provided under
section 6-4.5-103 6-4-203;
(3) A Hart-Scott-Rodino form or additional documentary material
provided by the attorney general of another state;
-5- SB26-041

(4) That the form or the additional documentary material were
WAS filed or provided under section 6-4.5-103 6-4-203 or provided by the
attorney general of another state; or
(5) The merger proposed in the form.
(b) A form, additional documentary material, and other
information listed in subsection (a) of this section are exempt from
disclosure under the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72
of title 24.
(c) Subject to a protective order entered by an agency, court, or
judicial officer, the attorney general may disclose a form, additional
documentary material, or other information listed in subsection (a) of this
section in an administrative proceeding or judicial action if the proposed
merger is relevant to the proceeding or action.
(d) This article 4.5 PART 2 does not:
(1) Limit any other confidentiality or information-security
obligation of the attorney general;
(2) Preclude the attorney general from sharing information with
the federal trade commission or the United States department of justice
antitrust division, or a successor agency; or
(3) Preclude the attorney general from sharing information with
the attorney general of another state that has enacted the "Uniform
Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act" or a substantively equivalent act.
The other state's act must include confidentiality provisions at least as
protective as the confidentiality provisions of the "Uniform Antitrust
Pre-Merger Notification Act".
6-4-205. [Formerly 6-4.5-105] Reciprocity.
(a) The attorney general may disclose a Hart-Scott-Rodino form
-6- SB26-041

and additional documentary material filed or provided under section
6-4.5-103 6-4-203 to the attorney general of another state that enacts the
"Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act" or a substantively
equivalent act. The other state's act must include confidentiality
provisions at least as protective as the confidentiality provisions of the
"Uniform Antitrust Pre-Merger Notification Act".
(b) At least two business days before making a disclosure under
subsection (a) of this section, the attorney general shall give notice of the
disclosure to the person filing or providing the form or additional
documentary material under section 6-4.5-103 6-4-203.
6-4-206. [Formerly 6-4.5-106] Civil penalty.
The attorney general may seek imposition of a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars per day of noncompliance on a person that
fails to comply with section 6-4.5-103 (a), (b), or (c) 6-4-203 (a) OR (b).
A civil penalty imposed under this section is subject to procedural
requirements applicable to the attorney general, including the
requirements of due process.
6-4-207. [Formerly 6-4.5-107] Uniformity of application and
construction.
In applying and construing this uniform act, a court shall consider
the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.
6-4-208. [Formerly 6-4.5-108] Transitional provision.
This article 4.5 PART 2 applies only to a pre-merger notification
filed on or after August 6, 2025.
PART 3
TRANSACTIONS AFFECTING HEALTH-CARE ENTITIES
6-4-301. Definitions.
-7- SB26-041

AS USED IN THIS PART 3, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) (a) "CLINICALLY INTEGRATED NETWORK" MEANS A NETWORK
IMPLEMENTING AN ACTIVE, ONGOING, AND WRITTEN PROGRAM TO
EVALUATE AND MODIFY PRACTICE PATTERNS OF THE NETWORK'S
PHYSICIAN PARTICIPANTS AND TO CREATE A HIGH DEGREE OF
INTERDEPENDENCE AND COOPERATION AMONG THE PHYSICIANS, WHICH
NETWORK IS REASONABLY DESIGNED TO CONTROL COSTS AND IMPROVE
PATIENT OUTCOMES.
(b) "CLINICALLY INTEGRATED NETWORK" INCLUDES AN
ACCOUNTABLE CARE ORGANIZATION, AS DESCRIBED IN 42 U.S.C. SEC.
1395jjj.
(2) (a) "HEALTH-CARE ENTITY" MEANS:
(I) ANY OF THE FOLLOWING FACILITIES REQUIRED TO BE
CURRENTLY OR PREVIOUSLY LICENSED OR CERTIFIED IN THE STATE:
(A) A HEALTH FACILITY DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-1.5-103 (1)(a);
OR
(B) A HOSPITAL AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO PART 5 OF
ARTICLE 21 OF TITLE 23 OR ARTICLE 29 OF TITLE 25;
(II) A FACILITY PROVIDING URGENT CARE;
(III) ANY OF THE FOLLOWING EMERGENCY MEDICAL AND TRAUMA
SERVICES AND ENTITIES:
(A) AN AMBULANCE SERVICE LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION
25-3.5-314, EXCEPT THOSE WHOLLY OWNED AND OPERATED BY A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OR A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR AGENCY;
(B) A HEALTH FACILITY THAT EMPLOYS OR CONTRACTS FOR
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDERS PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 3.5 OF
-8- SB26-041

TITLE 25 TO RENDER MEDICAL CARE TO PATIENTS, EXCEPT THOSE HEALTH
FACILITIES WHOLLY OWNED AND OPERATED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
OR A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR AGENCY;
(C) IMAGING, RADIOLOGY, AND DIAGNOSTIC SERVICES
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-1-108;
(D) A CLINICAL LABORATORY REQUIRED TO BE CERTIFIED
PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 263a;
(E) A MAMMOGRAPHY FACILITY REQUIRED TO BE CERTIFIED
PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 263b;
(F) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
27-50-101;
(G) A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER PROVIDING SERVICES FOR
HEALTH PLANS IN COLORADO; AND
(H) A CORPORATION, PROFESSIONAL SERVICE CORPORATION,
PARTNERSHIP, GROUP PRACTICE, PROVIDER NETWORK, BUSINESS TRUST,
ASSOCIATION, ORGANIZATION, FACILITY, OR OTHER ENTITY THAT
PROVIDES PROFESSIONAL SERVICES REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED OR
CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 200, 210, 215, 220, 230, 240, 245, 255,
270, 275, 280, 285, 290, 310, OR 315 OF TITLE 12; OR
(IV) AN ENTITY THAT MEETS THE DEFINITION OF A CARRIER, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 10-16-102 (8) OR 24-50-603 (2).
(b) "HEALTH-CARE ENTITY" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A HEALTH FACILITY REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED OR CERTIFIED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 27 OR 27.5 OF TITLE 25, ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 25.5,
OR SECTION 25.5-10-214 OR OTHER NURSING, LONG-TERM, HOME, OR
HOSPICE CARE FACILITIES DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-1.5-103; OR
(II) A HEALTH-CARE ENTITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
-9- SB26-041

(2)(a)(III)(H) OF THIS SECTION REPRESENTING FEWER THAN SEVEN
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS LICENSED OR CERTIFIED IN COLORADO.
(3) "HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER" MEANS A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN
ASSISTANT LICENSED UNDER ARTICLE 240 OF TITLE 12, OR AN ADVANCED
PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSE LICENSED UNDER ARTICLE 255 OF TITLE 12,
WHO PROVIDES HEALTH-CARE SERVICES, INCLUDING MEDICAL CARE,
CONSULTATION, DIAGNOSIS, OR TREATMENT.
(4) (a) "MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION" OR "TRANSACTION"
MEANS AN AGREEMENT, ARRANGEMENT, OR ACTIVITY THAT RESULTS IN:
(I) A PERSON ACQUIRING, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, INCLUDING
THROUGH THE ACQUISITION OF AN ULTIMATE PARENT COMPANY, THE
OWNERSHIP, MANAGEMENT, OPERATIONS, OR CONTROL OF A HEALTH-CARE
ENTITY;
(II) THE CONSOLIDATION OF TWO OR MORE ENTITIES, INCLUDING
CONSOLIDATING THROUGH A COMMON PARENT ORGANIZATION OR
FORMING A NEW ORGANIZATION, WHERE THE ACQUIRED ENTITY IS A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY OR WHERE TWO OR MORE HEALTH-CARE ENTITIES
ARE UNDER COMMON OWNERSHIP, MANAGEMENT, OR CONTROL AS A
RESULT OF THE CONSOLIDATION; OR
(III) ANY RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN TWO OR MORE ENTITIES THAT
PERMITS THE ENTITIES TO NEGOTIATE JOINTLY WITH INSURERS OR
THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATORS REGARDING RATES PROVIDED BY A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY OR THAT PERMITS ONE HEALTH-CARE ENTITY TO
NEGOTIATE ON BEHALF OF THE OTHER HEALTH-CARE ENTITY WITH
INSURERS OR THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATORS REGARDING RATES FOR
SERVICES PROVIDED BY A HEALTH-CARE ENTITY.
(b) "MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION" OR "TRANSACTION"
-10- SB26-041

INCLUDES:
(I) A SERIES OF TRANSACTIONS TAKING PLACE IN ANY FIVE-YEAR
PERIOD WHERE AN ENTITY THAT HAS PREVIOUSLY ENGAGED IN A
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION ACQUIRES ONE OR MORE ADDITIONAL
HEALTH-CARE ENTITIES ENGAGED IN THE SAME OR SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR PROFESSIONAL SERVICES AS THAT ENTITY'S PREVIOUS MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(II) AN ACQUISITION OF FORTY PERCENT OR MORE OF VOTING
SECURITIES OR NONCORPORATE INTERESTS, INCLUDING ASSETS, CAPITAL,
STOCK, MEMBERSHIP INTERESTS, OR EQUITY INTERESTS, OF A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY OR AN ULTIMATE PARENT COMPANY OF A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY;
(III) AN ARRANGEMENT THAT INCLUDES THE SALE OF VOTING
SECURITIES OR NONCORPORATE INTERESTS IN ANY AMOUNT THAT ALTERS
VOTING CONTROL OF, OR RESPONSIBILITY FOR, THE GOVERNING BODY OF
A HEALTH-CARE ENTITY OR AN ULTIMATE PARENT COMPANY OF A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY;
(IV) AN ARRANGEMENT THAT ALLOWS AN ENTITY TO EXERCISE
DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, OVER A
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY'S ASSETS, LIABILITIES, CONTRACTS, OPERATIONS, OR
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(V) AN EXCLUSIVE EMPLOYMENT CONTRACT INVOLVING THE
ACQUISITION OF FIVE OR MORE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS THAT PRACTICE
AS PART OF THE SAME HEALTH-CARE ENTITY.
(c) "MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION" OR "TRANSACTION" DOES
NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CORPORATE REORGANIZATION;
-11- SB26-041

(II) RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN ENTITIES UNDER COMMON
OWNERSHIP;
(III) A TRANSACTION IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4)(a) OR (4)(b)
OF THIS SECTION:
(A) THAT HAS A PURCHASE PRICE, CAPITAL COMMITMENT, OR
EQUIVALENT CONSIDERATION OF LESS THAN TEN MILLION DOLLARS; OR
(B) WHERE ANY HEALTH-CARE FACILITY THAT IS A PARTY TO THE
TRANSACTION HAS AN ANNUAL NET PATIENT SERVICE REVENUE OF NO
MORE THAN FIVE MILLION DOLLARS;
(IV) A SERVICE OR MANAGEMENT CONTRACT TO PROVIDE
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES TO A HEALTH-CARE ENTITY IF THE CONTRACT
DOES NOT ALLOW FOR THE SERVICE OR MANAGEMENT PROVIDER TO
EXERCISE DIRECT OR INDIRECT OPERATIONAL CONTROL OF THE
HEALTH-CARE ENTITY, INCLUDING DECISIONS RELATED TO SERVICES
OFFERED AND PRICES;
(V) THE FORMATION OF CLINICALLY INTEGRATED NETWORKS;
(VI) CLINICAL AFFILIATIONS SOLELY FOR COLLABORATING ON
CLINICAL TRIALS AND PROVIDING GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION; OR
(VII) NONEXCLUSIVE CONTRACTS BETWEEN A HEALTH-CARE
ENTITY AND A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER PRIMARILY FOR CLINICAL
SERVICES.
(5) "THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATOR" MEANS AN ENTITY THAT
ADMINISTERS PAYMENTS FOR HEALTH-CARE SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A
CLIENT IN EXCHANGE FOR AN ADMINISTRATIVE FEE.
(6) "ULTIMATE PARENT COMPANY" MEANS AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT
CONTROLLED BY ANOTHER ENTITY.
6-4-302. Notice of material change transaction - form of notice
-12- SB26-041

- notice after modification of terms.
(1) NO LATER THAN SIXTY DAYS BEFORE THE CLOSING OF A
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION, THE PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION SHALL SUBMIT WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION IF:
(a) FOR MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING PARTIES
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-4-301 (3):
(I) ONE OR MORE PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION, OR AN ULTIMATE
PARENT COMPANY TO A PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION, HAVE AN AVERAGE
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST FIVE MILLION DOLLARS;
(II) THE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN AN ENTITY HAVING A
PROJECTED AVERAGE ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST FIVE MILLION
DOLLARS; OR
(III) THE TOTAL CONSIDERATION OFFERED IN THE TRANSACTION
IS AT LEAST FIVE MILLION DOLLARS; OR
(b) FOR MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING PARTIES
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-4-301 (2):
(I) ONE OR MORE PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION, OR AN ULTIMATE
PARENT COMPANY TO A PARTY TO THE TRANSACTION, HAVE AN AVERAGE
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST FIFTEEN MILLION DOLLARS;
(II) THE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN AN ENTITY HAVING A
PROJECTED AVERAGE ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST FIFTEEN
MILLION DOLLARS; OR
(III) THE TOTAL CONSIDERATION OFFERED IN THE TRANSACTION
IS AT LEAST FIFTEEN MILLION DOLLARS.
(2) FOR A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION THAT IS SUBJECT TO
THE NOTICE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, WRITTEN
-13- SB26-041

NOTICE PROVIDED BY THE PARTIES MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE NAMES AND HEADQUARTERS BUSINESS ADDRESSES OF ALL
PARTIES TO THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(b) IDENTIFICATION OF EACH LOCATION WHERE HEALTH-CARE
SERVICES ARE CURRENTLY PROVIDED BY EACH PARTY TO THE MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION;
(c) THE ANTICIPATED EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE PROPOSED
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION; AND
(d) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE AND PURPOSE OF THE
PROPOSED MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AND ANY MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTIONS COMPLETED BY ONE OR MORE OF THE PARTIES IN THE FIVE
FISCAL YEARS PRECEDING THE NOTICE. IN LIEU OF PROVIDING A
DESCRIPTION OF A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION COMPLETED IN THE
FIVE FISCAL YEARS PRECEDING THE NOTICE, A PARTY MAY PROVIDE A COPY
OF THE NOTICE FILED WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN CONNECTION WITH
THAT MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION.
(3) NO LATER THAN SIXTY DAYS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION, THE PARTIES TO A MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION THAT REQUIRES THE FILING OF A PREMERGER NOTIFICATION
WITH THE FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION OR THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL
"HART-SCOTT-RODINO ANTITRUST IMPROVEMENTS ACT OF 1976", 15
U.S.C. SEC. 18a ET SEQ., SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, INCLUDING:
(a) INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO COMPLY WITH THE PREMERGER
NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL "HART-SCOTT-RODINO
-14- SB26-041

ANTITRUST IMPROVEMENTS ACT OF 1976", 15 U.S.C. SEC. 18a ET SEQ.;
(b) ANY PREVIOUS NOTICES FILED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)
OF THIS SECTION OR A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE AND PURPOSE
OF EACH MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION INVOLVING ONE OR MORE OF
THE PARTIES THAT OCCURRED IN THE FIVE FISCAL YEARS PRECEDING THE
NOTICE; AND
(c) A CERTIFICATION THAT THE PARTIES WILL MAKE A DESCRIPTION
OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AVAILABLE ON A PUBLIC
WEBSITE WITHIN SEVEN DAYS AFTER THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION HAS BEEN CONSUMMATED, OR AS SOON THEREAFTER AS
PERMITTED BY STATE AND FEDERAL LAW.
(4) FOR A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION THAT IS NOT COVERED
BY SUBSECTION (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS SECTION, IF ONE OR MORE PARTIES,
OR AN ULTIMATE PARENT COMPANY TO A PARTY, HAVE AN AVERAGE
ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST THIRTY MILLION DOLLARS; IF THE
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN AN ENTITY HAVING A
PROJECTED AVERAGE ANNUAL GROSS REVENUE OF AT LEAST THIRTY
MILLION DOLLARS; OR IF THE TOTAL CONSIDERATION OFFERED IN THE
TRANSACTION IS AT LEAST THIRTY MILLION DOLLARS, THE PARTIES SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL NO LATER THAN
SIXTY DAYS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION, INCLUDING:
(a) THE PARTIES INVOLVED IN THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION, INCLUDING THE NAMES, HEADQUARTERS BUSINESS
ADDRESSES, AND WEBSITES OF ALL PARTIES, AND THE NAMES, CURRENT
HEADQUARTERS BUSINESS ADDRESSES, AND WEBSITES OF ANY ULTIMATE
PARENT COMPANIES OF THE PARTIES, AS DESCRIBED IN 16 CFR 801.1;
-15- SB26-041

(b) THE LEADERSHIP OF THE ENTITIES INVOLVED IN THE MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION, INCLUDING ALL BOARD MEMBERS, MANAGING
PARTNERS, MEMBER MANAGERS, AND OFFICERS;
(c) THE SERVICES IMPACTED BY THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION;
(d) THE CURRENT CONTRACTUAL RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN THE
ENTITIES AND INSURERS OR THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATORS THAT PROVIDE
FOR COVERAGE OF HEALTH-CARE SERVICES AND THE PROPOSED
RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN THE ENTITIES AND THE AFFECTED INSURERS OR
THIRD-PARTY ADMINISTRATORS;
(e) THE AGREEMENT OR AGREEMENTS THAT GIVE RISE TO THE
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AND ANY RELATED MANAGEMENT OR
SERVICES CONTRACTS;
(f) PLANNED AREAS OF EXPANSION, WHETHER IN EXISTING
MARKETS OR NEW MARKETS;
(g) ANY PLANS TO CLOSE FACILITIES, REDUCE WORKFORCES, OR
REDUCE OR ELIMINATE SERVICES;
(h) ANY PREVIOUS NOTICES FILED WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OR A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE AND
PURPOSE OF EACH MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION COMPLETED BY ONE
OR MORE OF THE PARTIES IN THE FIVE FISCAL YEARS PRECEDING THE
NOTICE; AND
(i) A CERTIFICATION THAT THE PARTIES WILL MAKE A DESCRIPTION
OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AVAILABLE ON A PUBLIC
WEBSITE WITHIN SEVEN DAYS AFTER THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION HAS BEEN CONSUMMATED, OR AS SOON THEREAFTER AS
PERMITTED BY STATE AND FEDERAL LAW.
-16- SB26-041

(5) A NOTICE SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OR (2) OF
THIS SECTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO A CHALLENGE BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.
(6) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION MAY SUBMIT
INFORMATION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER PARTY
TO THE SAME TRANSACTION.
(7) A TRANSACTION OR OTHER DEVICE ENTERED INTO OR
EMPLOYED FOR THE PURPOSE OF AVOIDING THE OBLIGATION TO COMPLY
WITH THIS SECTION IS VOID, AND WHETHER THE PARTIES MUST COMPLY
WITH THE NOTICE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION IS DETERMINED BY
APPLYING THIS PART 3 AND ANY ASSOCIATED RULES TO THE SUBSTANCE
OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION.
(8) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION MAY REQUEST
THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SUBJECT THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION TO A DIFFERENT CATEGORY OF NOTICE REQUIREMENT, AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS (1), (2), (3), AND (4) OF THIS SECTION, THAN
THE NOTICE REQUIREMENT THAT APPLIES DUE TO THE AVERAGE ANNUAL
GROSS REVENUE CLASSIFICATION OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY GRANT THE PARTY'S
REQUEST, CONSIDERING FACTORS INCLUDING WHETHER THE TRANSACTION
WILL PREVENT THE CLOSURE OF A FACILITY OR PRACTICE IN A RURAL OR
FRONTIER COMMUNITY.
(9) (a) A NOTICE PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION CEASES TO
BE EFFECTIVE IF THE TERMS OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION ARE
MATERIALLY ALTERED FOLLOWING THE SUBMISSION OF A WRITTEN NOTICE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) IF THE TERMS OF A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION ARE
-17- SB26-041

MATERIALLY ALTERED FOLLOWING THE SUBMISSION OF A WRITTEN NOTICE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE PARTIES SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE ALTERATION, INCLUDING NEW COPIES OF THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION THAT IS SUBJECT TO
ALTERATION.
(10) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY WAIVE ALL OR PART OF THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(11) NOTHING IN THIS PART 3 PROHIBITS THE PARTIES TO A
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION FROM VOLUNTARILY PROVIDING
INFORMATION TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(12) A FINAL ADVERSE ACTION BY A STATE REGULATOR AGAINST
A PARTY INVOLVED IN A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION OR A CHANGE
OF OWNERSHIP FORM REQUIRED BY THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT MAY BE SUBMITTED TO ASSIST IN
SATISFYING THE NOTICE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(13) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION SATISFIES
THE NOTICE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION, AS APPLICABLE,
BY:
(a) SUBMITTING A PREACQUISITION NOTIFICATION FILED WITH THE
COMMISSIONER OF INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-803.5 (3);
(b) SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP
REQUIRED BY THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND
ENVIRONMENT FOR THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL; OR
(c) SUBMITTING NOTICE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL PURSUANT TO
SECTION 6-19-202, 6-19-302, OR 6-19-402.
-18- SB26-041

6-4-303. Public inspection of records.
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL TREAT ALL INFORMATION AND
MATERIALS PROVIDED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS PART 3 AS
INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS OR RECORDS REGARDING INTELLIGENCE
INFORMATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 6-4-111 (6).
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
FROM DISCLOSING INFORMATION OBTAINED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO
ANOTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, ANOTHER DEPARTMENT OF ANY
GOVERNMENTAL OR PUBLIC ENTITY OF THIS OR ANY OTHER STATE, OR THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT IF THE OTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR
DEPARTMENT EXECUTES AN AGREEMENT THAT THE INFORMATION WILL
REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND WILL NOT BE USED IN ANY CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION AGAINST THE PERSON PROVIDING THE WRITTEN RESPONSE,
TESTIMONY, OR DOCUMENTS.
6-4-304. Prohibition of proposed material change transactions
that may have harmful effects - enforcement.
(1) A PERSON THAT CONSUMMATES A MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION VIOLATES PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 4 IF THE MATERIAL
CHANGE TRANSACTION MAY SUBSTANTIALLY LESSEN COMPETITION OR
TEND TO CREATE A MONOPOLY OR MAY HARM CONSUMER WELFARE.
(2) (a) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION SHALL NOT
CLOSE THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION UNTIL:
(I) AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS HAVE ELAPSED SINCE THE PARTIES TO
THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION LAST SUBMITTED WRITTEN NOTICE
TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OF THE TRANSACTION PURSUANT TO SECTION
6-4-302 AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS NOT NOTIFIED THE PARTIES TO
THE TRANSACTION THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REQUIRES MORE TIME
-19- SB26-041

TO REVIEW THE TRANSACTION OR THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WILL
CHALLENGE THE TRANSACTION PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF THIS ARTICLE 4;
(II) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS NOTIFIED THE PARTIES AND
PROVIDES A GOOD FAITH REASON THAT MORE TIME IS REQUIRED TO
REVIEW THE TRANSACTION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS NOT PROVIDED A SECOND
NOTICE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION, AT LEAST
FORTY-FIVE DAYS HAVE ELAPSED SINCE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
PROVIDED THE NOTICE; OR
(III) IF, NO LATER THAN FORTY-FIVE DAYS AFTER THE FIRST NOTICE
FOR ADDITIONAL TIME PROVIDED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF
THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AGAIN NOTIFIES THE PARTIES
THAT MORE TIME IS REQUIRED TO REVIEW THE TRANSACTION AND IS ABLE
TO SHOW BAD FAITH BY ANY OF THE PARTIES INVOLVED, AT LEAST
FORTY-FIVE DAYS HAVE ELAPSED SINCE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
PROVIDED THE SECOND NOTICE.
(b) (I) A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION DOES NOT
VIOLATE THIS SECTION BY INITIATING A PROCESS TO OBTAIN APPROVAL OF
THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION FROM ANOTHER STATE AGENCY AS
REQUIRED BY LAW.
(II) A DECISION BY ANOTHER STATE AGENCY TO PERMIT OR
AUTHORIZE A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION DOES NOT PREVENT THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM SEEKING RELIEF PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OR
PREVENT A COURT FROM FINDING THAT THE MATERIAL CHANGE
TRANSACTION MAY SUBSTANTIALLY LESSEN COMPETITION OR TEND TO
CREATE A MONOPOLY OR MAY HARM CONSUMER WELFARE.
6-4-305. Penalties - remedy - injunction.
-20- SB26-041

(1) FAILURE OF A PARTY TO A MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION TO
PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION AS REQUIRED
BY THIS PART 3 IS AN INDEPENDENT AND SUFFICIENT GROUND FOR A COURT
TO ENJOIN OR UNWIND THE MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION OR PROVIDE
OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF.
(2) A PERSON THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE TIMELY INFORMATION AS
REQUIRED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS LIABLE TO THE STATE FOR A
CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT MORE THAN TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS PER DAY FOR
EACH DAY DURING WHICH THE PERSON IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS PART 3.
BEFORE BRINGING SUCH AN ACTION OR SEEKING TO RECOVER A CIVIL
PENALTY, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PERMIT THE PERSON TO COME
INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 3 WITHIN TEN DAYS AFTER BEING
NOTIFIED OF THE ALLEGED NONCOMPLIANCE. THE RIGHT TO CURE
NONCOMPLIANCE DOES NOT EXIST ON OR AFTER THE CLOSING DATE OF THE
MATERIAL CHANGE TRANSACTION.
6-4-306. Effect on existing authorities - rules.
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES TO CARRY OUT
THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3, INCLUDING:
(a) RULES CLARIFYING THE TERMS USED IN THIS PART 3;
(b) RULES REQUIRING THAT PERSONS PROVIDE ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION IN ORDER TO COMPLY WITH SECTION 6-4-302 OR
PRESCRIBING THE FORM OF NOTICES SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SECTION
6-4-302; AND
(c) OTHER RULES AS MAY BE NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO
CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3.
(2) (a) NOTHING IN THIS PART 3 LIMITS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S
AUTHORITY UNDER THIS ARTICLE 4, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN
-21- SB26-041

THIS PART 3.
(b) NOTHING IN THIS PART 3 LIMITS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S
COMMON LAW POWERS.
(c) NOTHING IN THIS PART 3 AFFECTS THE REGULATORY
AUTHORITY OF A GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY OTHER THAN THE DEPARTMENT
OF LAW.
(d) THIS PART 3 PROVIDES THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS PART 3.
SECTION 2. Repeal of relocated provisions in this act. In
Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal article 4.5 of title 6.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-19-101, amend (2)
as follows:
6-19-101. Legislative declaration.
(2) Furthermore, for purposes of the attorney general's authority
over the transfer of nonprofit hospital assets, all nonprofit hospitals shall
be deemed to hold all of their assets in trust, and those assets shall be
deemed to be dedicated to the specific charitable purposes set forth in the
articles of incorporation or other organic documents of the nonprofit
entities that hold them in trust. The public is the beneficiary of this trust.
Nonprofit hospitals have a substantial and beneficial effect on the
provision of health care to the people of Colorado, providing as part of
their charitable purposes uncompensated care to the uninsured or
underinsured and including, but not limited to, providing moneys MONEY
and support for health-related research and education or other community
benefits. The general assembly also finds that transfers of the assets of
nonprofit hospitals to the for-profit sector may directly affect the
character and extent of the charitable use of those assets or the proceeds
-22- SB26-041

from the assets. The public also has an interest in knowing that the
transfer of the assets of a nonprofit hospital, or the proceeds from the
assets, preserves, to the extent practicable, their charitable purpose. The
general assembly believes it is in the best interest of the public to ensure
that the public interest is fully protected whenever the assets of a hospital
are transferred, to a for-profit entity except in the ordinary course of
business.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-19-102, amend the
introductory portion, (1), and (3); and add (4) as follows:
6-19-102. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 19, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) (a) (I) "Covered transaction" means any transaction that would
result in the sale, transfer, lease, exchange, or other disposition of:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the assets of a hospital; OR
(B) THE MANAGEMENT, CONTROL, OR OPERATIONS OF A HOSPITAL.
(II) A series of transactions taking place in any five-year period
which THAT would result in the aggregate of the transfer of fifty percent
or more of a hospital's assets shall in all circumstances be OR THE
TRANSFER OF THE MANAGEMENT, CONTROL, OR OPERATIONS OF A
HOSPITAL IS deemed to be a covered transaction.
(b) "Covered transaction" shall also include INCLUDES the sale,
transfer, or other disposition of the control of a parent company, holding
company, or other entity controlling a hospital.
(c) For the purposes of AS USED IN this subsection (1), "fifty
percent or more of the assets" shall be based on the fair market value of
all of the assets of the hospital.
-23- SB26-041

(3) "Hospital" means a FACILITY REQUIRED TO BE CURRENTLY OR
PREVIOUSLY licensed or certified AS A hospital as described in section
25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II), C.R.S. (1)(a), INCLUDING GENERAL
HOSPITALS, HOSPITAL UNITS, FREESTANDING EMERGENCY DEPARTMENTS,
CRITICAL ACCESS HOSPITALS, PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS, COMMUNITY
CLINICS, REHABILITATION HOSPITALS, AMBULATORY SURGICAL CENTERS,
AND OTHER SIMILAR FACILITIES.
(4) "NONPROFIT ENTITY" MEANS AN ENTITY THAT IS NOT A
FOR-PROFIT ENTITY, INCLUDING A NONPROFIT CORPORATION AND AN
ENTITY OPERATED BY A SPECIAL DISTRICT.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-19-103, amend (1)
as follows:
6-19-103. Procedures for covered transactions - notice -
attorney general powers.
(1) The parties to a covered transaction shall provide notice of
such transaction to the attorney general no later than sixty NINETY days
prior to the transaction closing or THE effective date of the transaction.
The notice to the attorney general shall be in writing; shall include the
information required in section 6-19-202, 6-19-302, or 6-19-402, OR
6-19-502, as applicable; and shall contain a certification that public notice
of the transaction will be given within seven days after the notification to
the attorney general.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-19-202 as
follows:
6-19-202. Notice.
Notice shall be provided by the parties to a covered transaction
according to section 6-19-103 and shall include a statement on the
-24- SB26-041

charitable purposes AND CHARITABLE MISSIONS of each nonprofit entity
entering into the covered transaction AND THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY
EACH NONPROFIT ENTITY IN FURTHERANCE OF THE NONPROFIT ENTITY'S
CHARITABLE PURPOSES AND CHARITABLE MISSIONS, as well as a statement
concerning the relationship of these CHARITABLE purposes AND MISSIONS
to the EACH hospital involved in the transaction. IF APPLICABLE, the
statement may SHALL include a certification by the chief executive officer
as approved by the board of directors or board of trustees of the nonprofit
entity transferring its assets that there will be no material change in the
charitable purposes, CHARITABLE MISSIONS, OR SERVICES PROVIDED IN
FURTHERANCE OF THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES OR MISSIONS to which the
transferred assets are dedicated as a result of the transaction.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 6-19-203 as follows:
6-19-203. Attorney general review and assessment.
(1) A COVERED TRANSACTION THAT WILL NOT RESULT IN A
MATERIAL CHANGE IN THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES, CHARITABLE MISSIONS,
OR SERVICES PROVIDED IN FURTHERANCE OF THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES
OR MISSIONS OF A NONPROFIT ENTITY ENTERING INTO THE COVERED
TRANSACTION, AND WILL NOT RESULT IN A TERMINATION OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL'S JURISDICTION OVER THE CHARITABLE ASSETS DUE
TO A TRANSFER OF A MATERIAL AMOUNT OF THOSE ASSETS OUTSIDE OF
THE STATE OF COLORADO, MAY PROCEED WITHOUT FURTHER REVIEW
UNDER THIS ARTICLE 19. WHEN REVIEWING WHETHER A MATERIAL
CHANGE WILL RESULT FROM A TRANSACTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S
AUTHORITY INCLUDES:
(a) CONTRACTING WITH, CONSULTING WITH, AND RECEIVING
-25- SB26-041

ADVICE FROM A STATE AGENCY ON TERMS AND CONDITIONS THAT THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE DIRECTOR OF THE AGENCY DEEM
APPROPRIATE;
(b) REQUIRING PRODUCTION OF MATERIAL DOCUMENTATION,
INCLUDING THE PROPOSED AGREEMENTS RELATING TO THE PROPOSED
TRANSACTION, AGREEMENTS REGARDING COLLATERAL TRANSACTIONS
RELATING TO THE PROPOSED TRANSACTION, AND ANY REPORTS OF
FINANCIAL AND ECONOMIC ANALYSIS THAT THE PARTIES REVIEWED OR
RELIED ON IN NEGOTIATING THE PROPOSED TRANSACTION. EXCEPT FOR
DOCUMENTS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES TO BE CONFIDENTIAL
AS A MATTER OF LAW, THE DOCUMENTS FILED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(b) MUST BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR REVIEW
AND COPYING DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS AT BOTH THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE AND THE OFFICES OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION. REASONABLE COSTS OF COPYING SHALL BE BORNE BY THE
PARTIES IF COPIES ARE REQUESTED AT THEIR OFFICES.
(c) PUBLISHING PUBLIC NOTICE OF THE COVERED TRANSACTION.
THE PUBLIC NOTICE MAY INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) A GENERAL STATEMENT DESCRIBING THE TERMS OF THE
TRANSACTION;
(II) THE PROPOSED DATE FOR THE CLOSING OR THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THE TRANSACTION;
(III) IF APPLICABLE, THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER'S
CERTIFICATION, AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 6-19-202;
(IV) THE MEANS BY WHICH PUBLIC COMMENT CAN BE RECEIVED;
AND
(V) INFORMATION RELATED TO A PUBLIC HEARING HELD PURSUANT
-26- SB26-041

TO SUBSECTION (1)(e) OF THIS SECTION;
(d) PROVIDING AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT; AND
(e) HOLDING A PUBLIC HEARING IN THE SAME MANNER AS
REQUIRED BY SECTION 6-19-404 (1).
(2) IN CONDUCTING A REVIEW TO DETERMINE WHETHER A
MATERIAL CHANGE WILL RESULT FROM A TRANSACTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS:
(a) WHETHER THE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN ANY REDUCTIONS
IN THE AVAILABILITY AND ACCESSIBILITY OF HEALTH-CARE SERVICES IN
THE COMMUNITIES SERVED BY THE HOSPITAL;
(b) WHETHER THE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN ANY REDUCTION
IN THE PROVISION OF COMMUNITY BENEFIT SPENDING OR ACTIVITIES AS
SET FORTH IN PART 7 OF ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 25.5; OR
(c) WHETHER THE TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN ANY REDUCTIONS
IN HEALTH-CARE SERVICES PROVIDED TO PUBLIC BENEFITS RECIPIENTS,
THE UNDERINSURED, OR THE UNINSURED.
(3) IF A TRANSACTION COVERED BY THIS PART 2 WILL RESULT IN A
MATERIAL CHANGE IN THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES, CHARITABLE MISSIONS,
OR SERVICES PROVIDED IN FURTHERANCE OF THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES
OR MISSIONS OF A NONPROFIT ENTITY ENTERING INTO THE COVERED
TRANSACTION, OR IF A TRANSACTION WILL RESULT IN A TERMINATION OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S JURISDICTION OVER A HOSPITAL'S ASSETS DUE
TO A TRANSFER OF A MATERIAL AMOUNT OF THOSE ASSETS OUTSIDE THE
STATE OF COLORADO, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY EXERCISE THEIR
COMMON LAW AUTHORITY TO ASSESS AND REVIEW OR CHALLENGE THE
TRANSACTION AS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. IF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL CONDUCTS AN ASSESSMENT OR REVIEW, THE
-27- SB26-041

FOLLOWING PROVISIONS APPLY TO THE ACTIONS OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL:
(a) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PERFORM A REVIEW AND
ASSESSMENT TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND WITH DUE
CONSIDERATION TO THE FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE PARTIES TO
THE TRANSACTION;
(b) IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL UNDER SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY:
(I) CONTRACT WITH PERSONS, INCLUDING ATTORNEYS,
ACCOUNTANTS, ACTUARIES, FINANCIAL ANALYSTS, AND HEALTH-CARE
ANALYSTS, AS IS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY TO ASSIST IN REVIEWING
A PROPOSED TRANSACTION. CONTRACT COSTS SHALL BE BORNE BY THE
PARTIES TO THE TRANSACTION AND MUST NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT THAT
IS REASONABLY NECESSARY TO CONDUCT THE REVIEW AND ASSESSMENT.
(II) ACCEPT AND EXPEND GRANTS, DONATIONS, OR BOTH, NOT TO
EXCEED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR THE PURPOSE OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ARTICLE 19. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
CREDIT THE GRANT OR DONATION TO THE NONPROFIT HEALTH CARE
ENTITY REVIEW CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 6-19-406 (1)(f). THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE NONPROFIT HEALTH
CARE ENTITY REVIEW CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 6-19-406 (1)(f)
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 19.
(c) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ALLOW A TRANSACTION THAT
SATISFIES THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:
(I) THE ASSETS CONTINUE TO BE DEDICATED TO THE SAME
CHARITABLE PURPOSE AND MISSION RELATED TO THE PROVISION OF
-28- SB26-041

HEALTH-CARE SERVICES IN THE COMMUNITY SERVED BY THE HOSPITAL,
UNLESS DOING SO IS UNLAWFUL, IMPRACTICABLE, IMPOSSIBLE TO ACHIEVE,
OR WASTEFUL, IN WHICH CASE THE ASSETS CONTINUE TO BE DEDICATED TO
A SIMILAR CHARITABLE PURPOSE AND MISSION;
(II) THE DIRECTORS OR TRUSTEES OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION HAVE NOT ACTED UNREASONABLY IN LIGHT OF THE
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE PARTIES;
(III) THE DIRECTORS OR TRUSTEES OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION HAVE NOT ACTED UNREASONABLY IN ACCOMMODATING THE
AFFECTED COMMUNITY OR COMMUNITIES; AND
(IV) THE DIRECTORS OR TRUSTEES OF THE PARTIES TO THE
TRANSACTION HAVE NOT BREACHED THEIR FIDUCIARY DUTIES OR
OTHERWISE ENGAGED IN MISCONDUCT IN NEGOTIATING OR ENGAGING IN
THE TRANSACTION; AND
(d) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY LIBERALLY CONSTRUE THE
CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF THIS SECTION IN FAVOR OF
ALLOWING A TRANSACTION TO PROCEED.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-19-302 as
follows:
6-19-302. Notice.
(1) The parties to a covered transaction governed by this part 3
shall provide the notice required by section 6-19-103.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION MUST:
(a) IDENTIFY THE ENTITIES INVOLVED IN THE TRANSACTION; AND
(b) INCLUDE A SUMMARY OF THE MAIN TERMS OF THE
TRANSACTION, INCLUDING HOW HOSPITAL ASSETS AND HEALTH-CARE
SERVICES WILL BE AFFECTED BY THE TRANSACTION AND WHETHER A
-29- SB26-041

NONPROFIT ENTITY'S ASSETS WILL BE AFFECTED BY THE TRANSACTION.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article
19 of title 6 as follows:
PART 5
FOR-PROFIT TO NONPROFIT TRANSACTIONS
6-19-501. Scope of part 5.
THIS PART 5 APPLIES TO COVERED TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING A
FOR-PROFIT HOSPITAL AND A NONPROFIT ENTITY.
6-19-502. Notice.
(1) THE PARTIES TO A COVERED TRANSACTION GOVERNED BY THIS
PART 5 SHALL PROVIDE THE NOTICE REQUIRED BY SECTION 6-19-103. THE
NOTICE MUST IDENTIFY:
(a) THE ENTITIES INVOLVED IN THE TRANSACTION;
(b) A SUMMARY OF THE MAIN TERMS OF THE TRANSACTION,
INCLUDING HOW HOSPITAL ASSETS AND HEALTH-CARE SERVICES WILL BE
AFFECTED BY THE TRANSACTION; AND
(c) THE CHARITABLE PURPOSES AND MISSIONS OF THE NONPROFIT
ENTITIES INVOLVED IN THE TRANSACTION, INCLUDING THE PROPOSED
CHARITABLE PURPOSE AND MISSION OF THE NEW NONPROFIT HOSPITAL.
6-19-503. Attorney general review and assessment.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY EXERCISE THEIR COMMON LAW
AUTHORITY TO ASSESS AND REVIEW OR CHALLENGE A COVERED
TRANSACTION GOVERNED BY THIS PART 5 AS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DECIDES TO
CONDUCT AN ASSESSMENT OR REVIEW, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
CONSIDER THE FACTORS AND TAKE THE ACTIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-19-203.
-30- SB26-041

SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-49-107 as
follows:
25-49-107. Providers - physicians - disclosure of certain
referrals - study and report - definitions - repeal.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "DESIGNATED HEALTH SERVICES" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 25.5-4-414 (1)(a).
(b) "FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP" MEANS AN OWNERSHIP OR
INVESTMENT INTEREST IN AN ENTITY FURNISHING DESIGNATED HEALTH
SERVICES. AN OWNERSHIP OR INVESTMENT INTEREST MAY BE REFLECTED
IN EQUITY, DEBT, OR OTHER INSTRUMENTS.
(c) "IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF THE PROVIDER" MEANS A
SPOUSE, NATURAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENT, SIBLING, NATURAL OR ADOPTIVE
CHILD, STEPPARENT, STEPCHILD, STEPSIBLING, IN-LAW, GRANDPARENT,
GRANDCHILD, OR SPOUSE OF A GRANDPARENT OR GRANDCHILD OF A
PROVIDER.
(d) "PROVIDER" MEANS:
(I) A DOCTOR OF MEDICINE OR OSTEOPATHY WHO IS LICENSED TO
PRACTICE MEDICINE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 240 OF TITLE 12;
(II) A DOCTOR OF DENTAL SURGERY OR DENTAL MEDICINE WHO IS
LICENSED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 220 OF TITLE
12;
(III) A DOCTOR OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE WHO IS LICENSED TO
PRACTICE PODIATRY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 290 OF TITLE 12;
(IV) A DOCTOR OF OPTOMETRY WHO IS LICENSED TO PRACTICE
OPTOMETRY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 275 OF TITLE 12; OR
-31- SB26-041

(V) A CHIROPRACTOR WHO IS LICENSED TO PRACTICE
CHIROPRACTIC PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 215 OF TITLE 12.
(2) (a) IF A PROVIDER REFERS A PATIENT TO AN ENTITY FOR
DESIGNATED HEALTH SERVICES AND THE PROVIDER, OR AN IMMEDIATE
FAMILY MEMBER OF THE PROVIDER, HAS A FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP WITH
THE ENTITY, THE PROVIDER SHALL DISCLOSE, OR PROVIDE CONSPICUOUS
NOTICE IN A COMMON AREA THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO ANYONE, THE NATURE
OF THE FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP TO THE PATIENT AT THE TIME OF THE
REFERRAL. AT THE PATIENT'S REQUEST, THE PROVIDER MAY PROVIDE THE
PATIENT WITH REASONABLE ALTERNATIVE REFERRAL OPTIONS FOR
ENTITIES WITH WHICH THE PROVIDER, OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER
OF THE PROVIDER, DOES NOT HAVE A FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP.
(b) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF AN
EXCEPTION TO THE PROHIBITIONS ESTABLISHED IN 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1395nn
OR REGULATIONS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1395nn.
(c) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP OR A REFERRAL FOR DESIGNATED HEALTH
SERVICES IF THE FINANCIAL RELATIONSHIP OR REFERRAL FOR DESIGNATED
HEALTH SERVICES WOULD NOT VIOLATE 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1395nn OR
REGULATIONS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1395nn.
(3) AN ENTITY THAT PROVIDES DESIGNATED HEALTH SERVICES AS
A RESULT OF A REFERRAL WITHOUT INFORMING THE PATIENT OF THE
REFERRING PROVIDER'S FINANCIAL INTEREST, OR THE FINANCIAL INTEREST
OF AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF THE REFERRING PROVIDER, IN THE
ENTITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT
PRESENT A CLAIM OR BILL TO AN INDIVIDUAL, A THIRD-PARTY PAYER, THE
-32- SB26-041

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, OR ANY OTHER
ENTITY FOR THE DESIGNATED HEALTH SERVICES.
(4) A PROVIDER THAT FAILS TO PROVIDE THE FINANCIAL
RELATIONSHIP DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION THREE OR
MORE TIMES IS SUBJECT TO A FIVE-HUNDRED-DOLLAR FINE.
(5) (a) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL STUDY THE EFFECT OF THIS
SECTION AND THE IMPACT ON CONSUMER KNOWLEDGE AND COSTS.
(b) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 15, 2029, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LAW'S PRESENTATION
DURING ITS"SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY SECTION 2-7-203, THE
FINDINGS OF THE STUDY CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF
THIS SECTION.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2030.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-101 as
follows:
6-4-101. Short title.
The short title of this article 4 PART 1 is the "Colorado State
Antitrust Act of 2023".
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-108 as
follows:
6-4-108. Facilitating or aiding and abetting.
(1) It is unlawful to facilitate or aid and abet another person in
violating this article 4 PART 1.
(2) Each separate instance of facilitating or aiding and abetting
another person in violating this article 4 PART 1 is a separate violation of
this article 4 PART 1.
-33- SB26-041

SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-109, amend (2)
introductory portion, (3), (4), and (5) introductory portion as follows:
6-4-109. Exemptions.
(2) Nothing in this article 4 PART 1 shall be construed to:
(3) A professional review committee constituted and conducting
its reviews and activities in accordance with the provisions of part 2 of
article 30 of title 12, or the members of the professional review
committee, shall not be held or construed to be an illegal combination or
conspiracy in restraint of trade under this article 4 PART 1.
(4) Any person, activity, or conduct exempt or immune under the
laws of this state or exempt or immune from the federal antitrust laws is
exempt or immune from this article 4 PART 1 without regard to any
monetary threshold imposed by federal law; except that nothing in this
article 4 PART 1 shall be deemed to modify the specific provisions of part
4 of article 4 of title 10.
(5) Nothing in this article 4 PART 1 prohibits or shall be construed
to prohibit the formation and operation of:
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-110 as
follows:
6-4-110. Jurisdiction - venue.
(1) Primary jurisdiction of any cause of action brought pursuant
to this article 4 PART 1 is vested in the district courts of this state.
(2) Any cause of action brought pursuant to this article 4 PART 1
may be brought in any judicial district in which the alleged violation
occurred, any injury was allegedly suffered, or any defendant resides.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-111, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(c), (5) introductory portion, and (6) as follows:
-34- SB26-041

6-4-111. Civil discovery request - rules.
(1) When the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that
any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or may have information
related to a violation of this article 4 PART 1 or of any provision of the
federal antitrust statutes that may be enforced by the attorney general, the
attorney general may:
(c) Make true copies, at the expense of the attorney general, of any
documents examined pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, which
copies may be offered into evidence in lieu of the originals in any civil
action brought pursuant to this article 4 PART 1. The person producing the
documents may require that the attorney general make copies of the
documents. If the attorney general determines the use of originals is
necessary, the attorney general shall pay to have copies of those
documents made for use by the person producing the documents.
(5) If any person fails to appear or fails to cooperate with any
investigation or inquiry pursuant to a request or subpoena issued pursuant
to this section, the attorney general may apply to any district court for an
appropriate order to effect the purposes of this section. The application
must state that there is reasonable cause to believe that the order applied
for is necessary to investigate, prosecute, or terminate a violation of this
article 4 PART 1. If the court is satisfied that reasonable cause exists, the
court may:
(6) (a) The attorney general may deem any investigative records
or records regarding intelligence information obtained under this article
4 PART 1 public records subject to public inspection pursuant to part 2 of
article 72 of title 24.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (6) shall be construed to prevent or
-35- SB26-041

limit the attorney general's authority to issue public statements describing
or warning of any course of conduct or conspiracy that violates this article
4 PART 1, whether the public statements are made on a local, statewide,
regional, or nationwide basis.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-112 as
follows:
6-4-112. Enforcement by the attorney general.
(1) The attorney general may institute actions or proceedings to
prevent or restrain violations of this article 4 PART 1, including actions to
prevent or restrain unfair methods of competition in or affecting
commerce.
(2) The attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of the
state or any governmental or public entity injured, either directly or
indirectly, in its business or property by reason of any violation of this
article 4 PART 1 and, if successful, shall recover any actual damages
sustained by the entity. If the violation alleged and proved is determined
by the court to be a per se violation of this article 4 PART 1, the attorney
general, on behalf of the entity, may recover three times the actual
damages that the entity sustains.
(3) (a) The attorney general may bring a civil action as parens
patriae on behalf of any individual residing within the state who is
injured, either directly or indirectly, in the individual's business or
property by reason of any violation of this article 4 PART 1 and, if
successful, shall recover any actual damages sustained by the individual.
If the violation alleged and proved is determined by the court to be a per
se violation of this article 4 PART 1, the attorney general, on behalf of the
individual, may recover three times the actual damages that the individual
-36- SB26-041

sustains.
(b) In any parens patriae action in which actual or treble damages
are recovered, the court, in its discretion, may determine that the amount
of damages recovered is too small to make any refund to parens group
members practicable. In that event, the court may direct the damages to
be paid to the general fund of the state or to some other governmental or
public entity as the court deems appropriate or may require that damages
be paid as rebates or price reductions to future consumers.
(4) In addition to any other remedies provided in this article 4
PART 1, the attorney general may request, and a court may make, orders
or judgments as may be necessary to:
(a) Fully compensate or make whole any person injured, either
directly or indirectly, by means of any restraint of trade in violation of this
article 4 PART 1; or
(b) Prevent any unjust enrichment by any person through any
restraint of trade in violation of this article 4 PART 1.
(5) In any action brought pursuant to this article 4 PART 1, the
attorney general, if successful, is entitled to recover the costs of
investigation, expert fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney
fees.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-113, amend (1)
as follows:
6-4-113. Civil penalties.
(1) The attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of the
state to seek the imposition of a civil penalty for any violation of this
article 4 PART 1. The court, upon finding a violation of this article 4 PART
1, shall impose a civil penalty to be paid to the general fund of the state
-37- SB26-041

in an amount not to exceed one million dollars for each such violation.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-114, amend (1)
as follows:
6-4-114. Enforcement - injunction.
(1) Any person injured, either directly or indirectly, in its business
or property by reason of a violation of this article 4 PART 1 may file an
action to prevent or restrain the violation.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-115, amend (1)
as follows:
6-4-115. Enforcement - civil damages.
(1) Any person injured, either directly or indirectly, in its business
or property by reason of any violation of this article 4 PART 1 may sue
and, if successful, is entitled to recover any actual damages that the
person sustained. If the violation alleged and proved is determined by the
court to be a per se violation of this article 4 PART 1, the person may
recover three times the actual damages that the person sustains.
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-116 as
follows:
6-4-116. Notice to the attorney general.
Any person that files a civil action that includes any allegation of
a violation of this article 4 PART 1 shall, simultaneously with the filing of
the action in district court, serve a copy of the complaint on the attorney
general.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-4-118, amend (1)
as follows:
6-4-118. Enforcement - criminal proceedings.
(1) The attorney general shall prosecute all criminal proceedings
-38- SB26-041

for violations of this article 4 PART 1, whether by indictment or direct
information filed in the appropriate district court.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-119 as
follows:
6-4-119. Statute of limitations.
(1) Any civil action commenced pursuant to this article 4 PART 1
must be brought within four years after the date that the cause of action
accrued. For purposes of this article 4 PART 1, a cause of action accrues:
(a) When the circumstances giving rise to the cause of action are
discovered or should have been discovered in the exercise of reasonable
diligence; or
(b) On the date that the last in a series of acts or practices in
violation of this article 4 PART 1 occurred, including any acquisitions or
series of acquisitions that, in the aggregate, may constitute a violation of
this article 4 PART 1.
(2) Any criminal proceeding brought pursuant to this article 4
PART 1 must be commenced within six years after the alleged criminal act
occurred.
(3) If the attorney general commences a proceeding or action for
any violation of this article 4 PART 1, the running of the statute of
limitations with respect to every cause of action that is based in whole or
in part on any matter complained of in the proceeding or action is
suspended during the pendency of the proceeding or action and for one
year after the conclusion of the proceeding or action.
(4) Whenever any civil or criminal proceeding is brought by the
United States to prevent, restrain, or punish violations of any federal
antitrust laws, the running of the statute of limitations with respect to any
-39- SB26-041

action under this article 4 PART 1 that is based in whole or in part on any
matter complained of in the federal proceeding is suspended during the
pendency of the federal proceeding and for one year after the conclusion
of the federal proceeding.
(5) Except as expressly provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, no other limitation terminates the period within which the
attorney general may file an action for a violation of this article 4 PART 1.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-120 as
follows:
6-4-120. Remedies - cumulative.
The remedies provided in this article 4 PART 1 are cumulative
except as otherwise expressly limited.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 6-4-121 as
follows:
6-4-121. Void contracts - refund.
(1) Any contract or agreement that a person makes while a
member of any combination, conspiracy, trust, or pool prohibited under
this article 4 PART 1 that is founded upon, is the result of, grows out of,
or is connected with any violation of this article 4 PART 1, either directly
or indirectly, is void, and the person may not recover based on or benefit
from the contract or agreement.
(2) Any payments made upon, under, or pursuant to a contract or
agreement for the benefit of a person that is a member of any
combination, conspiracy, trust, or pool prohibited under this article 4
PART 1 may be recovered in an action brought by the party making the
payments or by the party's heirs, personal representatives, or assigns.
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-21-626
-40- SB26-041

as follows:
24-21-626. Unfair trade practices.
(1) The provisions of the "Unfair Practices Act", article 2 of title
6, and the "Colorado State Antitrust Act of 2023", PART 1 OF article 4 of
title 6, are specifically applicable to charitable gaming activities
conducted by any licensee. Within thirty days after receiving a complaint
alleging a violation of either of the acts, the licensing authority shall
transmit the complaint to the attorney general.
(2) The licensing authority shall revoke the license of a licensee
that violates any provision of article 2 of title 6 or PART 1 OF article 4 of
title 6 for a period of one year after the date of the finding of the
violation. Upon the expiration of such period, the licensee may apply for
the issuance of a new license.
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-17-410
as follows:
25-17-410. Limited exemption from antitrust, restraint of
trade, and unfair trade practices provisions.
If a producer or group of producers participating in a paint
stewardship program or a stewardship organization contracted by one or
more producers to implement a paint stewardship program engages in an
activity performed solely in furtherance of implementing the paint
stewardship program and in compliance with the provisions of this part
4, the activity is not a violation of the antitrust, restraint of trade, and
unfair trade practices provisions of the "Unfair Practices Act", article 2
of title 6, or the "Colorado State Antitrust Act of 2023", PART 1 OF article
4 of title 6.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-17-711
-41- SB26-041

as follows:
25-17-711. Limited exemption from antitrust, restraint of
trade, and unfair trade practices provisions.
If the program or any other plan approved by the executive director
pursuant to this part 7 engages in an activity performed solely in
furtherance of implementing the program or plan and in compliance with
this part 7, the activity is not a violation of the antitrust, restraint of trade,
and unfair trade practices provisions of the "Unfair Practices Act", article
2 of title 6, or the "Colorado State Antitrust Act of 2023", PART 1 OF
article 4 of title 6.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-17-1016
as follows:
25-17-1016. Antitrust.
If a battery stewardship organization engages in an activity
performed solely in furtherance of implementing an approved plan in
compliance with this part 10, the activity is not a violation of the antitrust,
restraint of trade, and unfair trade practices provisions of the "Unfair
Practices Act", article 2 of title 6, or the "Colorado State Antitrust Act of
2023", PART 1 OF article 4 of title 6.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-3-104.3, amend
(1)(a)(II)(D) as follows:
40-3-104.3. Manner of regulation - competitive responses -
economic development rate - definitions - repeal.
(1) (a) Upon application by any public utility providing electric,
natural gas, or steam service, the commission shall authorize such public
utility to provide utility services to a specific customer or potential
customer by contract without reference to its tariffs on file with the
-42- SB26-041

commission if the commission finds that:
(II) For contracts with existing customers involving natural gas
service:
(D) The price of any such service provided pursuant to this
subparagraph (II) SUBSECTION (1)(a)(II) shall be justified and shall not be
less than the marginal cost of the service to the public utility. If the price
is less than marginal cost, this shall be deemed to be an illegal restraint
of trade subject to the provisions of PART 1 OF article 4 of title 6; C.R.S.;
and
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 40-15-106
as follows:
40-15-106. Cross-subsidization prohibited - illegal restraint of
trade.
The price of telecommunications services or products which THAT
are not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall not be priced
below cost by use of subsidization from customers of services and
products subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, and any such
cross-subsidization is deemed to be an illegal restraint of trade subject to
the provisions of PART 1 OF article 4 of title 6. C.R.S.
SECTION 31. Effective date - applicability. (1) Except as
otherwise provided in this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Part 3 of article 4 of title 6, Colorado Revised Statutes, as
enacted in section 1 of this act, takes effect November 1, 2026.
(3) Section 6-4-302, Colorado Revised Statutes, as enacted in
section 1 of this act, applies to material change transactions in which an
offer is made on or after November 1, 2026.
SECTION 32. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
-43- SB26-041

determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-44- SB26-041